District of Columbia statutes.
42-1307

Scope of disclosure.

The specification of items for disclosure in this chapter does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of statutory law regarding fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in transfer transactions. If the transferor provides to the prospective transferee the residential real property disclosure statement required by this chapter (or the other information described § 42-1303(b) or (c)), any licensed agent of the transferor shall be deemed to have complied with the licensee’s obligations under § 42-1703 to disclose to a customer material adverse facts concerning the physical condition of the property.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 8, 46 DCR 2111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-957.